nl: Schakelhoes meegeleverd installatiemateriaal: Tape; Kabelbinders; Bevestigingsclips; Montageschroeven; Borgring; Sierlijst; Sierframe; Overig
el: Περιλαμβάνεται υλικός εξοπλισμός για την εγκατάσταση της φούσκας λεβιέ ταχυτήτων: Κολλητική ταινία; Δεματικά καλωδίων; Κλιπ τοποθέτησης; Βίδες τοποθέτησης; Δακτύλιος συγκράτησης; Διακοσμητικό πλαίσιο; Διακοσμητικό πλαίσιο; Άλλο
pl: Osprzęt montażowy mieszka zmiany biegów w zestawie: Taśma klejąca; Opaski zaciskowe; Klipsy montażowe; Śruby montażowe; Pierścień ustalający; Ramka maskująca; Ramka wykończeniowa; Inne
ro-RO: Elemente de instalare incluse pentru manșonul schimbătorului: Bandă adezivă; Coliere pentru cablu; Cleme de montare; Șuruburi de montare; Inel de reținere; Ramă de finisaj; Cadru de finisaj; Altele
tr: Vites körüğü montaj donanımı dahil: Yapışkan bant; Kablo bağları; Montaj klipsleri; Montaj vidaları; Tutucu halka; Trim çerçevesi; Trim iskeleti; Diğer
sl-SI: Vključeno okovje za namestitev manšete prestavne ročice: Lepilni trak; Kabelske vezice; Pritrdilne sponke; Pritrdilni vijaki; Zadrževalni obroček; Okrasni okvir; Okvir; Drugo
lt-LT: Įtraukti pavarų svirties apdangalo montavimo elementai: Lipni juosta; Kabelių dirželiai; Tvirtinimo spaustukai; Tvirtinimo varžtai; Fiksavimo žiedas; Apdailos rėmelis; Apdailos rėmas; Kita
it: Elementi di installazione del soffietto del cambio inclusi: Nastro adesivo; Fascette stringicavo; Clip di montaggio; Viti di montaggio; Anello di ritenuta; Cornice di finitura; Telaio di finitura; Altro
bg-BG: Включен монтажен обков за маншона на скоростния лост: Залепваща лента; Кабелни превръзки; Монтажни щипки; Монтажни винтове; Задържащ пръстен; Декоративна рамка; Декоративен панел; Друго
zh-TW: 包含排檔套安裝五金配件: 膠帶; 束線帶; 安裝夾; 安裝螺絲; 固定環; 飾板; 裝飾框架; 其他
ja: シフトブーツ取付部品付属: 粘着テープ; 結束バンド; 取り付けクリップ; 取り付けネジ; リテーナーリング; トリムベゼル; トリムフレーム; その他
pt-PT: Equipamento de instalação da bota da alavanca de mudanças incluído: Fita adesiva; Braçadeiras de plástico; Molas de montagem; Parafusos de montagem; Anel de retenção; Moldura de acabamento; Estrutura de acabamento; Outro
de: Enthaltenes Montagematerial für die Schaltmanschette: Klebeband; Kabelbinder; Befestigungsclips; Befestigungsschrauben; Haltering; Zierblende; Zierrahmen; Sonstige
vi: Bao gồm trong trang thiết bị lắp đặt bọc cần số: Băng dính; Dây thít; Kẹp gắn; Vít gắn; Vòng giữ; Khung viền; Khung ốp; Khác
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia je montážny materiál na inštaláciu manžety radiacej páky: Lepiaca páska; Sťahovacie pásky; Montážne spony; Montážne skrutky; Prídržný krúžok; Ozdobný rámik; Ozdobný rám; Iné
en: Shift boot installation hardware included: Adhesive tape; Cable ties; Mounting clips; Mounting screws; Retainer ring; Trim bezel; Trim frame; Other
hr-HR: Uključen hardver za instalaciju manžete mjenjača: Ljepljiva traka; Kabelske vezice; Pričvrsne kopče; Pričvrsni vijci; Prsten za zadržavanje; Ukrasni okvir; Ukrasni okvir; Drugo
th: รวมการติดตั้ง Shift boot ไว้ด้วย: เทปกาว; สายรัดเคเบิลไทร์; คลิปยึด; สกรูยึด; แหวนล็อก; กรอบตกแต่ง; โครงตกแต่ง; อื่นๆ
ru: Входящий в комплект крепеж для установки чехла рычага переключения передач: Клейкая лента; Кабельные стяжки; Крепежные зажимы; Крепежные винты; Стопорное кольцо; Декоративная рамка; Декоративный каркас; Другое
es: Accesorios de instalación incluidos de la funda de la palanca de cambios: Cinta adhesiva; Bridas; Clips de montaje; Tornillos de montaje; Anillo de retención; Bisel embellecedor; Marco embellecedor; Otro
cs: Součástí je montážní hardware pro kryt řadicí páky: Lepicí páska; Stahovací pásky; Montážní spony; Montážní šrouby; Přídržný kroužek; Krycí rámeček; Krycí rám; Jiné
pt-BR: Coifa de câmbio ferragens de instalação incluídas: Fita adesiva; Abraçadeiras plásticas; Clipes de montagem; Parafusos de montagem; Anel de retenção; Moldura de acabamento; Estrutura de acabamento; Outros
sv: Ingående installationsmaterial för växelspaksskydd: Tejp; Buntband; Monteringsklämmor; Monteringsskruvar; Låsring; Ram; Kantram; Övrigt
zh-CN: 随附换挡杆防尘罩安装硬件: 胶带; 扎带; 安装夹; 安装螺丝; 固定环; 装饰面板; 装饰框架; 其他
nb: Monteringsutstyr for girspakmansjett inkludert: Teip; Strips; Monteringsklips; Monteringsskruer; Holdering; Pynteramme; Pynteramme; Annet
fi: Mukana toimitettava vaihdekepin suojakumin asennuslaite: Teippi; Nippusiteet; Kiinnitysklipsit; Kiinnitysruuvit; Pidätinrengas; Koristekehys; Verhoilukehys; Muu
hu: Váltószoknya-rögzítőelemek a csomagban: Ragasztószalag; Kábelkötegelők; Rögzítőkapcsok; Rögzítőcsavarok; Rögzítőgyűrű; Díszkeret; Díszkeret profil; Egyéb
ko: 시프트 부트 설치 하드웨어 포함 여부: 접착 테이프; 케이블 타이; 마운팅 클립; 마운팅 나사; 리테이너 링; 트림 베젤; 트림 프레임; 기타
fr: Éléments de montage inclus avec le soufflet de levier de vitesses: Ruban adhésif; Attaches de câble; Clips de montage; Vis de montage; Anneau de retenue; Cadre de finition; Cadre décoratif; Autre
da: Monteringsdele inkluderet til gearmanchet: Tape; Kabelbindere; Monteringsclips; Monteringsskruer; Låsering; Pynteramme; Monteringsramme; Andet